Illinois, session 104th, HB1499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 53-1.5 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/3-1.5 new)7    Sec. 3-1.5. Residence; educational institution. 8Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3-1, a person may 9not register to vote in the election district in which the 10person attends an educational institution if that person does 11not reside in the election district in which that educational 12institution is located.